Utah statutes.
64-9b-6.   Rules.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

